Maine, session 132, LD59.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1102, sub-§1, ¶O, as amended by PL 2013, c. 194, §7, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (14) to read:
(14) Paramethoxyethylamphetamine, PMEA; and
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1102, sub-§1, ¶P, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 194, §8, is
amended by amending subparagraph (15) in the first blocked paragraph to read:
This subparagraph does not include a drug listed in section 1102 or a drug approved
by the United States Food and Drug Administration.; and
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1102, sub-§1, ¶Q is enacted to read:
Q. Tianeptine.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.